Maryland, session 2025, HB0349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–809.
(c) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(4) of this
section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor vehicle is
recorded by a speed monitoring system while being operated in violation of this subtitle.
(2) (I) [A] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed $40.
(II) 1. THIS SUBPARAGRAPH APPLIES TO A CIVIL PENALTY
ASSESSED TO THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE THAT IS RECORDED BY
A SPEED MONITORING SYSTEM WHILE BEING OPERATED ON MARYLAND ROUTE 210
(PISCATAWAY HIGHWAY) IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY IN VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
2. SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 3 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, A THE MAXIMUM CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH IS
AS FOLLOWS:
A. FOR EXCEEDING THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT
BY BETWEEN 12 AND 15, INCLUSIVE, MILES PER HOUR, $60 $50 $40;
B. FOR EXCEEDING THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT
BY BETWEEN 16 AND 19, INCLUSIVE, MILES PER HOUR, $80 $70;
C. FOR EXCEEDING THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT
BY BETWEEN 20 AND 29, INCLUSIVE, MILES PER HOUR, $140 $120;
D. FOR EXCEEDING THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT
BY BETWEEN 30 AND 39, INCLUSIVE, MILES PER HOUR, $270 $230; OR

HOUSE BILL 349 3
E. FOR EXCEEDING THE MAXIMUM POSTED SPEED LIMIT
BY 40 MILES PER HOUR OR MORE, $500 $425.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (d)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
Chapter 806 of the Acts of 2018, as amended by Chapter 606 of the Acts of 2023
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2018. [It shall remain effective for a period of 10 years and, at the end of
September 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.